vi: Chức năng chỉ báo được theo dõi: Số bóng (balls); Bóng & đánh lỗi (strike); Tùy chỉnh/Khác; Số lượt xuống bóng (downs); Lượt ném bóng (overs) & cửa cờ (wickets); lượt chơi & số lần ném bóng; loại; loại & lượt chơi; loại & điểm số; đánh lỗi (strikes); đánh lỗi & loại; Khác
ja: 指標Functions追跡: ボール; ボール＆ストライク; カスタム/その他; ダウン; オーバー＆ウィケット; イニング＆球数; アウト; アウト＆イニング; アウト＆スコア; ストライク; ストライク＆アウト; その他
el: Λειτουργίες δείκτη που παρακολουθούνται: Μπάλες; Μπάλες & strike; Προσαρμοσμένο/άλλο; Ντάουν; Όβερ & γουίκετ; Ίνινγκ & αριθμός ρίψεων; Άουτ; Άουτ & ίνινγκ; Άουτ & σκορ; Strike; Strike & άουτ; Άλλο
fi: Pelimittarin toiminnot: Syötöt (balls); Syötöt (balls & strikes); Mukautettu/muu; Yritykset (downs); Overs ja wickets; Vuoroparit ja syöttöjen määrä; Palot (outs); Palot ja vuoroparit; Palot ja pisteet; Suorat syötöt (strikes); Suorat syötöt ja palot; Muu
zh-TW: 指示器追蹤項目: 壞球數; 好壞球數; 自訂/其他; 檔數 (美式足球); 輪數與三柱門 (板球); 局數與投球數; 出局數; 出局數與局數; 出局數與得分; 好球數; 好球數與出局數; 其他
sk-SK: Sledované funkcie indikátorov: Bally; Bally a strajky; Vlastné/iné; Downy; Overy a bránky; Smeny a počet nadhodov; Auty; Auty a smeny; Auty a skóre; Strajky; Strajky a auty; Iné
sl-SI: Spremljane funkcije indikatorja: Slabi meti; Slabi in dobri meti; Po meri/drugo; Poskusi (downs); Serije in vratca (overs & wickets); menjave in število metov (innings & pitch count); izločitve (outs); izločitve in menjave; izločitve in rezultat; dobri meti (strikes); dobri meti in izločitve; Drugo
nl: Indicator gevolgde functies: Wijdballen; Wijdballen & slagballen; Aangepast/overige; Downs; Overs & wickets; Innings & pitchcount; Outs; Outs & innings; Outs & score; Strikes; Strikes & outs; Overige
th: ฟังก์ชันอุปกรณ์ช่วยนับที่ติดตาม: บอล; บอลและสไตรค์; กำหนดเอง/อื่นๆ; ดาวน์; โอเวอร์และวิกเก็ต; อินนิงและจำนวนพิตช์; เอาต์; เอาต์และอินนิง; เอาต์และคะแนน; สไตรค์; สไตรค์และเอาต์; อื่นๆ
da: Indikatorens registrerede funktioner: Balls; Balls og strikes; Brugerdefineret/andet; Downs; Overs og wickets; innings og pitch-antal; outs; outs og innings; outs og score; strikes; strikes og outs; Andet
fr: Éléments suivis par l’indicateur: Balles; Balles et prises; Personnalisé/autre; Essais; Séries de lancers et guichets; Manches et compte de lancers; Retraits; Retraits et manches; Retraits et score; Prises; Prises et retraits; Autre
zh-CN: 可追踪的指示器功能: 坏球数; 坏球数与好球数; 自定义/其他; 进攻档数; 轮数与三柱门数; 局数与投球数; 出局数; 出局数与局数; 出局数与得分; 好球数; 好球数与出局数; 其他
nb: Indikatoregenskaper sporet: Baller; Baller og strikes; Tilpasset/annet; Downs; Overs og wickets; Innings og antall kast; Outs; Outs og innings; Outs og poeng; Strikes; Strikes og outs; Annet
ru: Отслеживаемые функции индикатора: Болы; Болы и страйки; Пользовательские/другое; Дауны; Оверы и калитки; Иннинги и счет питчей; Ауты; Ауты и иннинги; Ауты и счет; Страйки; Страйки и ауты; Другое
es: Funciones controladas del indicador: Bolas; Bolas y strikes; Personalizado/otro; Downs; Overs y wickets; entradas y conteo de lanzamientos; outs; outs y entradas; outs y puntuación; strikes; strikes y outs; Otro
pt-PT: Funções indicadoras rastreadas: Bolas; Bolas e strikes; Personalizado/outro; Downs; Overs e wickets; innings e contagem de lançamentos; outs; outs e innings; outs e pontuação; strikes; strikes e outs; Outro
bg-BG: Проследявани функции на индикатора: Болове; Болове и страйкове; Персонализирано/други; Даунове; Оувъри и уикети; Ининги и брой хвърляния; Аутове; Аутове и ининги; Аутове и резултат; Страйкове; Страйкове и аутове; Други
en: Indicator functions tracked: Balls; Balls & strikes; Custom/other; Downs; Overs & wickets; innings & pitch count; outs; outs & innings; outs & score; strikes; strikes & outs; Other
tr: Gösterge tarafından izlenen işlevler: Toplar; Toplar ve isabetler; Özel/diğer; Haklar; Over'lar ve wicket'lar; İnning'ler ve atış sayısı; Out'lar; Out'lar ve inning'ler; Out'lar ve skor; İsabetler; İsabetler ve out'lar; Diğer
de: Verfolgte Anzeigefunktionen: Balls; Balls & Strikes; Benutzerdefiniert/Sonstige; Downs; Overs & Wickets; Innings & Pitch-Count; Outs; Outs & Innings; Outs & Punktestand; Strikes; Strikes & Outs; Sonstige
hr-HR: Praćene funkcije indikatora: Loptice; Loptice i udarci; Prilagođeno/ostalo; Pokušaji; Overi i wicketi; Ininzi i broj bacanja; Izbacivanja; Izbacivanja i ininzi; Izbacivanja i rezultat; Udarci; Udarci i izbacivanja; Ostalo
cs: Sledované funkce indikátoru: Bally; Bally a strajky; Vlastní / jiné; Downy; Overy a wickety; Směny a počet nadhodů; Outy; Outy a směny; Outy a skóre; Strajky; Strajky a outy; Jiné
it: Funzioni monitorate dell'indicatore: Ball; Ball e strike; Personalizzato/altro; Down; Over e wicket; Inning e numero di lanci; Out; Out e inning; Out e punteggio; Strike; Strike e out; Altro
hu: Nyomon követett mutatók: Rossz dobás; Rossz és jó dobások; Egyéni/egyéb; Kísérletek (downs); Játszmák és kapuk; játékrészek és dobásszám; kiesések; kiesések és játékrészek; kiesések és pontszám; jó dobások (strikes); jó dobások és kiesések; Egyéb
pl: Śledzone funkcje wskaźnika: Balle (narzuty); Balle i strike'i; Niestandardowe / inne; Próby (Downs); Overy i wickety; Inningi i liczba rzutów; Auty; Auty i inningi; Auty i wynik; Strike'i; Strike'i i auty; Inne
ko: 추적된 지표 Functions: 볼; 볼 및 스트라이크; 맞춤형/기타; 다운; 오버 및 위켓; 이닝 및 투구 수; 아웃; 아웃 및 이닝; 아웃 및 스코어; 스트라이크; 스트라이크 및 아웃; 기타
sv: Spårade indikatorfunktioner: Bollar; Bollar och strikes; Anpassat/övrigt; Downs; Övers och wickets; Innings och antal kast; Outs; Outs och innings; Outs och poäng; Strikes; Strikes och outs; Övrigt
pt-BR: Indicador funções monitoradas: Bolas; Bolas e strikes; Personalizado/outro; Downs; Overs e wickets; entradas e contagem de arremessos; eliminações; eliminações e entradas; eliminações e pontuação; strikes; strikes e eliminações; Outro
ro-RO: Functions ale indicatorilor urmărite: Balls; Balls și strikes; Personalizat/altele; Downs; Overs și wickets; Inninguri și număr de aruncări; Outs; Outs și inninguri; Outs și scor; Strikes; Strikes și outs; Altele
lt-LT: Sekamos indikatoriaus funkcijos: Kamuoliukai; Kamuoliukai ir straikai; Tinkinta / kita; Bandymai; Overiai ir varteliai; Kėliniai ir metimų skaičius; Autai; Autai ir kėliniai; Autai ir rezultatas; Straikai; Straikai ir autai; Kita